Alaska statutes. Title 41. Public Resources.
Article 9. Conservation Action Corps; Youth Hostel System.

Revisor’s notes. —

The division of parks, referred to in this article, is now named the division of parks and outdoor recreation.

Collateral references. —

40 Am. Jur. 2d, Hotels, Motels, and Restaurants, § 1 et seq.

43A C.J.S., Inns, Hotels, and Eating Places, §§ 2-16.

Sec. 41.21.900.
Purpose of AS 41.21.900 — 41.21.908.

The purpose of AS

41.21.900

—

41.21.908

is to provide avenues of action for youth in the state interested in the preservation of a healthy environment by establishing a volunteer corps to teach and practice conservation on all levels of activities which are environment related.
The aim is to foster and supplement programs on the local and state level and provide some of the manpower needed to successfully accomplish the goal of a healthy and pleasant environment in which to live.

History.

(§ 1 ch 168 SLA 1972)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.385. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 41.21.902.
Alaska Conservation Action Corps created.

There is created in the division of parks of the department the Alaska Conservation Action Corps.

History.

(§ 1 ch 168 SLA 1972)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.385. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 41.21.904.
Activities of corps.

The corps may be assigned

to provide staff services for public agencies involved in planning for the future of our environment;

tasks of cleaning litter from city streets, highways, local parks, neighborhoods, beaches, natural forests, rivers, creeks, state and national parks on a continuing basis;

to participate in neighborhood improvement programs including the creation of neighborhood parks and playgrounds, supplementing local government efforts on a voluntary basis on request;

to fire prevention activities in forest land, including the cleaning of brush and deadfalls and the construction and maintenance of fire trails and firebreaks and firefighting in time of need;

the task of building and maintaining hiking and riding trails and campsites, improving wildlife habitats and protection of wildlife refuges and wilderness areas under supervision of the Department of Fish and Game;

to participate in drainage and erosion control improvements on public land and the reforestation of fire-devastated areas;

the task of conducting conservation summer camp programs for youths to learn and practice conservation skills;

monitoring duties in areas of environmental concern where control and enforcement are maintained such as the monitoring of air and water pollution levels or checking on how well developers are meeting subdivision regulations.

History.

(§ 1 ch 168 SLA 1972)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.395. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 41.21.906.
Compensation.

Part-time corps members shall be paid on an hourly basis, to be determined by the commissioner.

Compensation for corps members who are involved in continuous service in an away-from-home situation shall be set on a weekly or monthly basis to be determined by the commissioner.

History.

(§ 1 ch 168 SLA 1972)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.400. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 41.21.908.
Nonapplicability of child labor laws.

AS

23.10.325

—

23.10.370

do not apply to AS

41.21.900

—

41.21.908

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 168 SLA 1972)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.405. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 41.21.910.
Alaska Youth Hostel System established.

There is established the Alaska youth hostel system administered by the division of parks of the department.

History.

(§ 1 ch 39 SLA 1977)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.410. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 41.21.912.
Duties of division.

The division shall

after consultation with community organizations or individuals and after maximum utilization of existing local effort, plan and facilitate the implementation of a statewide system of youth hostel facilities;

administer a program of grants to eligible nonprofit corporations, municipalities, and organizations for construction, maintenance, and operation of youth hostels;

cooperate and consult with national or international organizations established for the purpose of establishing or regulating youth hostel facilities and follow, where appropriate, the specific guidelines established by the American Youth Hostel Association and the International Youth Hostel Association;

adopt, in accordance with AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act), regulations governing the establishment and administration of youth hostel facilities.

History.

(§ 1 ch 39 SLA 1977)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.420. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 41.21.914.
Hostel locations.

In developing the statewide system of Alaska youth hostels, the division shall, within the limits of available funding, and after receiving the recommendations of the coordinator of the Alaska youth hostel program, establish at least one youth hostel in each of the five following major regions of the state: arctic, southcentral, interior, southwestern, and southeastern.
Hostel facilities shall be located, when possible, within major population areas within those regions. Other hostels may be established within the five regions as funding permits.

History.

(§ 1 ch 39 SLA 1977)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.430. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 41.21.916.
Hostel facility.

Each youth hostel facility shall be equipped with suitable toilet and kitchen facilities. Each facility shall be supervised under regulations adopted by the division of parks.

History.

(§ 1 ch 39 SLA 1977)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.440. Renumbered in 1983.

Sec. 41.21.918.
Duties of coordinator.

The director of the division of parks shall designate a member of the division staff as coordinator of the Alaska youth hostel program.
The coordinator shall

recommend to the division of parks locations for the construction of youth hostels;

advise the division on use policy for the Alaska youth hostel system;

render other assistance considered necessary and appropriate by the division;

establish criteria for the grant programs authorized under AS

41.21.912

(2) and have approval authority for grants made under AS

41.21.912

(2).

History.

(§ 1 ch 39 SLA 1977)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 41.20.450. Renumbered in 1983.